Hawaii statutes.
§425-11 Record of statements. The
director shall keep books or files in which the information required by this
chapter to be filed with the director shall be recorded. The books or files
shall be open to public inspection. [L 1969, c 247, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 204,
§8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; gen ch 1985; am L 2002, c 130, §83]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next